test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-nuorra_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjektiv - nuorra: # 

    nuorra+A+Attr: nuorra

    nuorra+A+Sg+Nom: nuorra
    nuorra+A+Pl+Nom: nuora

#    nuorra+A+Sg+Gen: nuora
#    nuorra+A+Sg+Acc: nuorav
#    nuorra+A+Sg+Ill: nuorraj
#    nuorra+A+Sg+Ine: nuoran
#    nuorra+A+Sg+Ela: nuorast
#    nuorra+A+Sg+Com: nuorajn
#    nuorra+A+Pl+Gen: nuoraj
#    nuorra+A+Pl+Acc: nuorajt
#    nuorra+A+Pl+Ill: nuorajda
#    nuorra+A+Pl+Ine: nuorajn
#    nuorra+A+Pl+Ela: nuorajst
#    nuorra+A+Pl+Com: nuoraj
#    nuorra+A+Ess: nuorran

    nuorra+A+Comp+Attr: nuorap

    nuorra+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: nuorap
    nuorra+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: nuoraba

#    nuorra+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: nuorabu
#    nuorra+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: nuorabuv
#    nuorra+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: nuorabuj
#    nuorra+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: nuorabun
#    nuorra+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: nuorabust
#    nuorra+A+Comp+Sg+Com: nuorabujn
#    nuorra+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: nuorabuj
#    nuorra+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: nuorabujt
#    nuorra+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: nuorabujda
#    nuorra+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: nuorabujn
#    nuorra+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: nuorabujst
#    nuorra+A+Comp+Pl+Com: nuorabuj
#    nuorra+A+Comp+Ess: nuorabun

    nuorra+A+Superl+Attr: nuoramus

    nuorra+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: nuoramus
    nuorra+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: nuoramusa
